New Jersey, session 221, A2825.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.   The Juvenile Justice Commission, created pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1995, c.284 (C.52:17B-170), shall establish an arts education pilot program to be administered by the commission pursuant to the provisions of this act. The commission shall consult with the New Jersey State Council on the Arts in the Department of State in the development, operation, administration, and evaluation of the pilot program.  The pilot program shall provide for the development of three model arts education programs to deliver innovative arts-based programming for juvenile offenders in detention and correction facilities in this State during a five-year period. The model programs, which shall be developed through organizational partnerships including, but not limited to, State and local arts organizations, community-based agencies, philanthropic entities, and the private sector, shall have the following goals: (1)   to prepare juvenile offenders for educational achievement by developing imagination, reasoning, judgment and the critical thinking skills necessary for problem solving and decision making; (2)   to develop an arts-infused program based on interdisciplinary and thematic units; (3)   to broaden the role of the teacher through staff development to include such diverse roles as instructor, coach, mentor and exemplar; (4)   to improve student performance as determined by standard measures and alternative assessment strategies; (5)   to enhance student self-concept as determined by measures of self-esteem; (6)   to encourage understanding of traditional, local and diverse cultures; (7)   to integrate program activities with professional and community-based arts organizations; and (8)   to further evaluate and research arts education and its impact on the positive development and rehabilitation of juvenile offenders. b.    The commission shall forward a request for proposals for the development of arts-based programs under this act to all appropriate agencies and organizations, including, but not limited to, all State and local arts organizations in this State. An organization which wants to participate in the pilot program shall submit a proposal to the commission.  The proposal shall outline the organizations plan for arts-based programming for juvenile offenders to enhance positive development, excellence, student motivation, and self-esteem. The proposal shall include, but not be limited to, the following information: (1)   the specific elements of the proposed arts programming; (2)   the content, techniques, and materials to be used to advance the organizational ability, critical thinking, problem solving, creative, and other skills of the juvenile offenders participating in the program; (3)   the manner in which professional development experiences in the arts will be factored into the program design; and (4)   the funding sources for the program for a five-year period. c.     The commission shall select three programs to participate in the pilot program based upon the commissions evaluation of the organizations ability to successfully implement model arts-based programming. The selection process shall include visits to potential organizations to ascertain their commitment and ability to develop and implement arts-based programming specifically for juvenile offenders. d.    The commission shall provide for the inclusion of an evaluation component within the pilot program. The assessment methods designed to evaluate the model programs shall be based on best practices for assessing arts-based programming for juvenile offenders and youth, specifically their educational outcomes and student progress in problem solving, comprehension, critical thinking and reasoning, and positive development. During the initial four years of the pilot program each model program shall undergo an annual evaluation conducted by the commission.  After the programs fourth year, the commission shall submit to the Governor, and to the Legislature pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), an evaluation of the pilot program and a recommendation on the advisability of its continuation and expansion within the State. e.     The Juvenile Justice Commission, in consultation with the New Jersey State Council on the Arts, shall adopt, pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), the rules and regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this act. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.